Maine, session 132, LD2007.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §20006-B, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 657, Pt. AA, §24,
is further amended to read:
1. Fund established. The Gambling Addiction Prevention and Treatment Fund,
referred to in this section as "the fund," is established for the purpose of supporting
gambling addiction analysis, prevention and treatment to be administered by the
department. The fund is a dedicated, nonlapsing fund into which payments are received in
accordance with Title 8, section 1036, subsection 2 and Title 8, section 1352, subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA c. 38 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 38
ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES GAMES PROHIBITED
§1351. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Board. "Board" means the Gambling Control Board established under section
1002.
2. Direct consideration. "Direct consideration" means a coin, token or other
representation of value that may be purchased by a person or received through a bonus or
promotion and that is used for playing or participating in an online sweepstakes game.
3. Dual-currency system of payment. "Dual-currency system of payment" means a
system of payment that allows a person to play or participate with direct consideration or
indirect consideration or that is otherwise designed in a manner that:
Page 1 - 132LR2873(03)

A. Prevents a person from directly purchasing coins, tokens or other representations
of value that are redeemable for any cash prize, cash award or cash equivalents or the
chance to win any cash prize, cash award or cash equivalents; and
B. Encourages a person to purchase services, products, coins, tokens or other
representations of value that are not exchangeable for a prize, award, cash or cash
equivalents or a chance to win a prize, award, cash or cash equivalents in order for that
person to obtain the coins, tokens or other representations of value that are
exchangeable for prizes, awards, cash or cash equivalents or a chance to win a prize,
award, cash or cash equivalents.
The unit may adopt rules to further define what constitutes a dual-currency system of
payment. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
4. Indirect consideration. "Indirect consideration" means a coin, token or other
representation of value that:
A. Is provided for free through a promotion or bonus or with the purchase of a related
product, service or activity; and
B. May be exchanged for a prize, award, cash or cash equivalents or a chance to win
a prize, award, cash or cash equivalents.
As used in this subsection, “related product, service or activity” includes a coin, token or
other representation of value that may be used for direct consideration.
5. Licensee. "Licensee" means a person that holds any one of the following licenses:
A. A license issued under chapter 31;
B. A license issued under chapter 33;
C. A license issued under chapter 35;
D. A license issued under chapter 39; or
E. A license issued under Title 17, chapter 62.
6. Online sweepstakes game. "Online sweepstakes game" means any game, contest
or promotion that:
A. Is available on the Internet and accessible on a mobile telephone, computer terminal
or similar access device;
B. Uses a dual-currency system of payment; and
C. Simulates casino-style gaming, including, but not limited to, slot machines, poker
and other table games, lottery games, bingo or sports wagering.
7. Unit. "Unit" means the Gambling Control Unit established as a bureau within the
Department of Public Safety under Title 25, section 2902, subsection 12.
§1352. Online sweepstakes games prohibited; fines; other penalties
A person that operates or promotes an online sweepstakes game or supports the
operation or promotion of an online sweepstakes game commits a civil violation.
1. Fine. A person that violates this section is subject to a fine of not less than $10,000
and not more than $100,000. All fines adjudged pursuant to this section must be collected
Page 2 - 132LR2873(03)

by the unit and distributed to the Gambling Addiction Prevention and Treatment Fund
established in Title 5, section 20006-B.
2. Revocation of license. If a licensee is convicted of unlawful gambling under Title
17-A, section 954, subsection 1-B or is otherwise found to be in violation of this section
through the administrative process applicable to the license held by the licensee, the unit
or board, whichever is responsible for administering the license, shall revoke the licensee's
license.
3. Ineligible for license. A person that is found to be in violation of this section is
ineligible to receive a license described in section 1351, subsection 5.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §954, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. A person is guilty of unlawful gambling if the person operates or promotes an
online sweepstakes game or supports the operation or promotion of an online sweepstakes
game. For the purposes of this subsection, "online sweepstakes game" has the same
meaning as in Title 8, section 1351, subsection 6.
Page 3 - 132LR2873(03)